Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4822
Donor Registry of Nebraska; establishment; duties; restriction on information.

(1) The federally designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska shall use the information received from the Department of Motor Vehicles under section 60-494 and the Game and Parks Commission under section 37-406.01 to establish and maintain the Donor Registry of Nebraska. A procurement organization located outside of Nebraska may obtain information from the Donor Registry of Nebraska when a Nebraska resident is listed as a donor on the registry and is not located in Nebraska immediately preceding or at the time of his or her death. The federally designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska may receive donor information from sources other than the Department of Motor Vehicles and shall pay all costs associated with creating and maintaining the Donor Registry of Nebraska.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Donor Registry of Nebraska facilitate organ and tissue donations and not inhibit such donations. A person does not need to be listed on the Donor Registry of Nebraska to be an organ and tissue donor.

(3) No person shall obtain information from the Donor Registry of Nebraska for the purpose of fundraising or other commercial use. Information obtained from the Donor Registry of Nebraska may only be used to facilitate the donation process at the time of the donor's death. General statistical information may be provided upon request to the federally designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska.

Laws 2004, LB 559, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 39;

Laws 2022, LB1082, § 3.